Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-206
Control of a wholesaler's business, defined.

Control of a wholesaler's business shall mean that combination of ownership interests which legally or in practical effect has the power to determine the policies under which the wholesaler's business shall be operated and shall include, but not be limited to, any change of ownership of twenty-five percent or more interest in the wholesaler's business or any change in the form of business entity being utilized by the wholesaler, including, but not limited to, a change from a sole proprietorship to a corporation.

Laws 1989, LB 371, § 6.